Maryland, session 2026, SB0488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
10–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Continuing care” means:
(1) continuing care in a retirement community; or
(2) continuing care at home.
(m) “Facility” means a physical plant in which continuing care in a retirement
community is provided in accordance with this subtitle.
(o) “Governing body” means a board of directors, board of trustees, or similar
group that ultimately directs the affairs of a provider, but whose members are not required
to have an equity interest in the provider.
(s) “Provider” means a person who:
(1) undertakes to provide continuing care; and
(2) is:
(i) the owner or operator of a facility; or
(ii) an applicant for or the holder of a preliminary, initial, or renewal
certificate of registration.
(v) “Subscriber” means an individual for whom a continuing care agreement is
purchased.
10–411.
(a) A provider may not enter into a continuing care agreement until the
Department issues a preliminary certificate of registration.
(b) An application for a preliminary certificate of registration shall be filed in a
form satisfactory to the Department.
(c) An application shall include at least the following information:

SENATE BILL 488 3
(10) the form and substance of any advertisement, advertising campaign, or
other promotional material for the facility that has not been previously submitted to the
Department; [and]
(11) A COPY OF THE BYLAWS OR SIMILAR INSTRUMENT OR AGREEMENT
GOVERNING THE PROVIDER; AND
[(11)] (12) other reasonable and pertinent information that the Department
requires.
10–425.
(a) A disclosure statement shall include:
(4) the organizational structure and management of the provider,
including:
(i) for a corporation or limited liability company, its name, the state
in which it is incorporated or formed, and the name of the chief executive officer;
(ii) for a partnership, the names of the general partners, the state
governing its formation, and the name of the primary individual responsible for managing
it;
(iii) for an unincorporated association, the names of the members, the
state governing its activities, and the name of the primary individual responsible for
managing it;
(iv) for a partnership that has a corporation or limited liability
company as one or more of its general partners, the name of each corporation or limited
liability company, the state in which it is incorporated or formed, and the name of the chief
executive officer;
(v) for a trust, the name of the trustee, the names of the owners of
beneficial interests in the trust, the state governing it, and the name of the primary
individual responsible for overseeing its activities; [and]
(VI) THE ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR OTHER FOUNDING
INSTRUMENT OF THE PROVIDER, INCLUDING ANY AMENDMENTS, AND A COPY OF
THE BYLAWS OR SIMILAR INSTRUMENT OR AGREEMENT GOVERNING THE PROVIDER;
AND
[(vi)] (VII) a statement whether the provider is qualified, or intends
to qualify, as a tax–exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Code;

SENATE BILL 488
(8) a description of the provider’s form of governance and the composition
of its governing body, and a statement that the provider will satisfy the requirements of §§
10–426 and 10–427 of this subtitle;
(9) if the provider has a governing body, a description of the process used
by the provider to:
(i) select a subscriber member of its governing body; and
(ii) satisfy the requirements of [§ 10–427(a)] § 10–427(C) of this
subtitle;
10–427.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “GOVERNING BODY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–401 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “PROVIDER” MEANS, IN ADDITION TO THE MEANING STATED IN §
10–401 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON WHO EFFECTIVELY CONTROLS THE FINANCIAL
AND POLICY DECISIONS IN PROVIDING CONTINUING CARE IN A RETIREMENT
COMMUNITY.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF A SUBSCRIBER MEMBER OF A GOVERNING BODY
SELECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IS TO REPRESENT THE INTERESTS
OF THE PROVIDER’S SUBSCRIBERS.
[(a)] (C) (1) If a provider has a governing body, at least one of the provider’s
subscribers shall be a full and regular member of the governing body.
(2) If the provider owns or operates [more than three] MULTIPLE facilities
in the State, the governing body shall include:
(I) AS A REGULAR MEMBER, ONE OF THE PROVIDER’S
SUBSCRIBERS WHO IS A SUBSCRIBER AT THE FACILITY WITH THE MOST
SUBSCRIBERS; AND
(II) AS AN ALTERNATE MEMBER, at least one of the provider’s
subscribers for every three facilities in the State, IF APPLICABLE.
(3) (i) If the governing body has only one subscriber, the governing body
shall authorize the appointment of an alternate subscriber to serve as a regular member of
the governing body if the regular subscriber is unable to fulfill the subscriber’s duties.

SENATE BILL 488 5
(ii) The alternate subscriber may:
1. attend all meetings of the governing body; and
2. vote only if the regular subscriber is unable to fulfill the
subscriber’s duties as a regular member of the governing body.
(4) (I) [Subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection, a] A regular or
alternate member of the governing body who is selected to meet the requirements of this
subsection shall be a subscriber at a facility in the State and be selected [according to the
same general written standards and criteria used to select other members of the governing
body] BY THE RESIDENT ASSOCIATION OF THE FACILITY.
(II) A REGULAR OR ALTERNATE MEMBER SELECTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS NOT REQUIRED TO
MEET THE SAME GENERAL WRITTEN STANDARDS AND CRITERIA USED TO SELECT
OTHER MEMBERS OF THE GOVERNING BODY, INCLUDING ANY REQUIREMENT TO
ADHERE TO A PARTICULAR RELIGIOUS FAITH OR PRINCIPLE.
[(5) The governing body shall confer with the resident association at each of
the provider’s facilities before the subscriber or alternate subscriber officially joins the
governing body.]
[(6)] (5) (i) A subscriber member or alternate subscriber member of a
governing body may report on nonconfidential deliberations, actions, and policies of the
governing body to the resident association.
(ii) The governing body in its sole but reasonable discretion shall
determine whether a matter is confidential.
[(7)] (6) The Secretary may waive the requirements of this subsection for
a provider in the process of decertifying as a provider, if the Secretary determines that
there are no subscribers willing and able to serve on the governing body.
[(b)] (D) (1) If a provider does not have a governing body, the provider shall
appoint a select committee of its officers or partners to meet at least quarterly with the
resident association at each of its facilities to address concerns of the subscribers and to
ensure that the opinions of subscribers are relayed to all officers or partners of the provider.
(2) If a facility does not have a resident association, the committee shall
meet with a reasonable number of representatives, not required to exceed fifteen, that the
subscribers elect.
[(c)] (E) As determined by the provider’s governing body, the provider shall
make available to subscribers either the nonconfidential portions of the minutes of each

SENATE BILL 488
meeting of the governing body or a summary of the nonconfidential portions of the minutes,
within 1 month of approval of the minutes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.